Final source/morphy/foma/AnimYaStem.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimYaStem;

LEXICON AnimYaStem
ගැහැණි AnimYaNoun;

LEXICON AnimYaNoun

+N+Nom+Sg+Anim:ිය #;
+N+Dat+Anim+Sg:ියට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ියගේ #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ියගෙන් #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියක් #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියක #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියකු #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුහට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකහට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියක්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියකුගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියක්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියකගේ #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියකගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියකුගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියක්ගෙන් #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ු #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගේ #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගෙන් #;
+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:ුනි #;
+N+Nom+Sg+Anim:ියත් #;
+N+Dat+Anim+Sg:ියටත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ියගේත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ියගෙන් #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියක් #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියක #;
+N+Acc+Indef+Sg:ියකු #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුටත් #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුහටත් #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකටත් #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකහටත් #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියක්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියකුගේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියක්ගේත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Indef:ියකගේත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියකගෙනුත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Indef:ියක්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ුත් #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුනුත් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ටත් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හටත් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හටත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගේත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගෙන්ත් #;
